Hawaii statutes.
§605-15 [OLD] REPEALED. L 1975, c 45,
pt of §2.

§605-15 Venue. Actions for violations
of section 605-14 shall be brought in the circuit court for the judicial
circuit in which the violation is alleged to have been committed. [L 1975, c
45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next